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PRE−CHECK
1.DESCRIPTION
(a)DIAGNOSISSYSTEM

When troubleshootingmultiplexOBD(M −OBD)vehicles,
the only difference from the usual troubleshooting proce-
dure is thatyouconnect thehand −held tester tovehicle,
and read off various data output from the vehicle’s power
tilt and telescopic steering ECU.
The power tilt and telescopic steering ECU records the
applicable DTCs when the computer detects a malfunc-
tion in the computer itself or its circuit.
Tocheck theDTCs,connectahand −held tester toDLC3
on the vehicle. The hand −held tester enables you to
erase the DTCs and activate the several actuators and
check freeze framedataandvarious formsonsteering
data.

(b) DATA LINK CONNECTOR 3 (DLC3)
The power tilt and telescopic steering ECU uses ISO
14230 forcommunication.The terminalarrangementof
DLC3complieswithSAEJ 1962andmatches the ISO
14230 format.

Terminal No. Connection Voltage or Resistance Condition

7 Bus + Line Pulse generation During transmission

4 Chassis Ground � BodyGround 1 � or less Always

16 Battery Positive � BodyGround9 − 14 V Always

HINT:
If your display shows ”UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE”
whenyouhaveconnected thecableofhand −held tester to
DLC3, turned the ignitionswitchONandoperated thehand −
held tester, there is a problem on the vehicle side or tester side.

(1) If communication isnormalwhen the tester iscon-
nected to another vehicle, inspect DLC3 on the orig-
inal vehicle.

(2) If communication is still not possible when the tester
is connected to another vehicle, the problem is
probably in the tester itself, so consult the service
department listed in the tester’s operator’s manual.



A05868

Hand−held
tester

DLC3

Hand−held
tester

DLC3

3.

LHD:

RHD:

DI−412 −DIAGNOSTICS POWERTILTANDPOWERTELESCOPICSTEERING
COLUMN

LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

2. DIAGNOSIS INSPECTION
(a) Check the DTC

(1)Prepare thehand −held tester.
(2)Connect thehand −held tester toDLC3at the lower

of the instrument panel.
(3)Turn the ignitionswitchONand turn thehand −held

tester switch ON.
(4)Use thehand −held tester tocheck theDTCsand

freeze frame data, note or print them (See the oper-
ator’s manual for operating instructions.).

(5) See page DI−413 to confirm the details of the DTC.
(b) Clear the DTC

The following actions will erase the DTC and freeze frame
data.
S Whenusing thehand −held tester:

Operating thehand −held tester toerase theDTCs
(See the operator’s manual for operating instruc-
tions.).

S Whennotusing thehand −held tester:
Disconnecting the battery terminals.


